District of Columbia statutes.
42-3173.06

Action by interested parties.

Interested parties shall have 30 days after the mailing or publication of the notice under § 42-3173.05, whichever is later, to take sufficient action.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 446
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468

History

This section is referenced in § 42-3173.07.

Section References